Mississippi, session 2026, SB2138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 9-3-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-3-1.  The state shall be divided into three (3) Supreme Court districts, as follows, to wit: The counties of Bolivar, Claiborne, Copiah, Hinds, Holmes, Humphreys, Issaquena, Jefferson, Kemper, Lauderdale, Leake, Madison, Neshoba, Newton, Noxubee, Rankin, Scott, Sharkey, Sunflower, Warren, Washington and Yazoo shall constitute the First District. The counties of Adams, Amite, Clarke, Covington, Forrest, Franklin, George, Greene, Hancock, Harrison, Jackson, Jasper, Jefferson Davis, Jones, Lamar, Lawrence, Lincoln, Marion, Pearl River, Perry, Pike, Simpson, Smith, Stone, Walthall, Wayne, and Wilkinson shall constitute the Second District. The counties of Alcorn, Attala, Benton, Calhoun, Carroll, Chickasaw, Choctaw, Clay, Coahoma, DeSoto, Grenada, Itawamba, Lafayette, Lee, Leflore, Lowndes, Marshall, Monroe, Montgomery, Oktibbeha, Panola, Pontotoc, Prentiss, Quitman, Tallahatchie, Tate, Tippah, Tishomingo, Tunica, Union, Webster, Winston and Yalobusha, shall constitute the Third District. SECTION 2.  Section 23-15-991, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 23-15-991.  The term of office of judges of the Supreme Court shall be eight (8) years.  Concurrently with the regular election for representatives in Congress, held next preceding the expiration of the term of an incumbent, and likewise each eighth year thereafter, an election shall be held in the Supreme Court district from which such incumbent was elected at which there shall be elected a successor to the incumbent, whose term of office shall thereafter begin on the first Monday of January of the year in which the term of the incumbent he succeeds expires. SECTION 3.  Section 23-15-993, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 23-15-993.  For the purpose of all elections, each of the nine (9) judgeships of the Supreme Court shall be considered a separate office.  The three (3) offices in each of the three (3) Supreme Court districts shall be designated Position Number 1, Position Number 2 and Position Number 3, and in qualifying for office as a candidate for any office of judge of the Supreme Court each candidate shall state the position number of the office to which he aspires and the regular election ballots shall so indicate.  In Supreme Court District Number 1:  Position Number 1 shall be that office for which the term ends in January 1966; Position Number 2 shall be that office for which the term ends in January 1965; and Position Number 3 shall be that office for which the term ends in January 1969.  In District Number 2: Position Number 1 shall be that office for which the term ends in January 1972; Position Number 2 shall be that office for which the term ends in January 1969; and Position Number 3 shall be for that office for which the term ends in January 1973.  In District Number 3:  Position Number 1 shall be that office for which the term ends in January 1969; Position Number 2 shall be that office for which the term ends in January 1969; and Position Number 3 shall be that office for which the term ends in January 1965. SECTION 4.  Section 41-73-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-73-7.  (1)  There is hereby created, with such duties and powers as are set forth in this act, a body politic and corporate, not a state agency, but an independent instrumentality exercising essential public functions, to be known as the Mississippi Hospital Equipment and Facilities Authority. (2)  The authority shall be governed by seven (7) members who shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate. (3)  The members shall at all times include the following: (a)  One (1) resident of each of the three (3) Supreme Court districts in the state; (b)  One (1) certified public accountant experienced in hospital finance; (c)  One (1) possessing not less than ten (10) years' experience in hospital management and finance; (d)  One (1) banker with experience in commercial lending or one (1) investment banker with experience in municipal finance; (e)  One (1) chosen at large. (4)  All members shall be residents of the state. SECTION 5.  Section 65-1-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-1-3.  There shall be a State Highway Commission which shall consist of three (3) members, one (1) from each of the three (3) Supreme Court Districts of the state.  Only qualified electors who are citizens of the Supreme Court District in which he or she seeks election for five (5) years immediately preceding the day of the election shall be eligible for such office; however, the five-year citizen requirement shall apply to elections held from and after January 1, 2020. On Tuesday after the first Monday in November of the year 1951, and every four (4) years thereafter, State Highway Commissioners shall be elected at the same time and in the same manner as the Governor is chosen; and the laws governing primary elections and the holding of general elections in this state shall apply to and govern the nomination and election of State Highway Commissioners.  The State Highway Commissioners so elected shall enter upon the discharge of the duties of their respective offices on the first Monday of January in the year next succeeding the date of their election, and they shall serve for a term of four (4) years and until their successors shall have been duly elected and qualified. If any one or more of the State Highway Commissioners elected under the provisions of this chapter shall die, resign or be removed from office, the Governor shall fill the vacancy by appointment for the unexpired term, provided such unexpired term shall not exceed twelve (12) months.  If such unexpired term shall exceed twelve (12) months, the Governor shall, within fifteen (15) days from the date of such vacancy, by proclamation duly made, call an election in the Supreme Court District in which such vacancy exists, to be held within sixty (60) days from the date of the issuance of such proclamation, at which election a State Highway Commissioner shall be elected to fill such vacancy for the remaining portion of such unexpired term.  Such special election shall be held in the manner provided for holding general elections in this state, as far as practicable. Each of said State Highway Commissioners, before entering upon the discharge of the duties of his office, shall take and subscribe the oath of office required of other state officials and shall execute bond in the sum of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), with some surety company authorized to do business in this state as surety, conditioned for the faithful performance of the duties of his office and for the faithful and true accounting of all funds or monies or property coming into his hands by virtue of his office, and conditioned further that all such funds, monies and property will be expended and used by him only for purposes authorized by law, said bond to be approved by the Governor or Attorney General and to be filed in the Office of the Secretary of State.  The premium on such bonds shall be paid out of the funds of the Mississippi Department of Transportation. From and after July 1, 1992, the State Highway Commission shall be the Mississippi Transportation Commission and the members thereof shall be the Mississippi Transportation Commissioners. SECTION 6.  Section 77-1-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 77-1-1.  A public service commission, hereinafter referred to in this chapter as the commission, is hereby created, consisting of three (3) members, one (1) to be elected from each of the three (3) Supreme Court districts by the qualified electors of such district.  Elections for such officers shall be held in the general election in November 1959, and every four (4) years thereafter, and the terms of office of the three (3) commissioners elected at the general election in November 1959 shall expire on December 31, 1963. The commissioners shall each receive a yearly salary fixed by the Legislature, payable monthly. The commissioners shall each possess the qualifications prescribed for the Secretary of State.  The commissioners shall not operate, own any stock in, or be in the employment of any telephone company, gas or electric utility company, or any other public utility that shall come under their jurisdiction or supervision. SECTION 7.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.